Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Public Employees Deferred Compensation Plan

18A.230.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

18A.230

to

18A.275

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Employee” means a person holding an office, position or employment in state government and agencies thereof and also includes persons in the public school system;

“Income” means earnings of a person while an employee of the state and agencies thereof or public school system;

“Asset” means any owned physical object or right having a monetary value;

“Trust fund” means a fund consisting of assets received and held by a government unit or its designated custodian to be expended or invested in accordance with conditions of the trust;

“Deferred compensation” means a method which allows employees to authorize income to be deducted from their current earning and set aside to be paid at a later date;

“Board” means the board of trustees as established by KRS

18A.245

;

“Authority” means the Kentucky Public Employees’ Deferred Compensation Authority; and

“Financial planning” means the process of determining whether and how a participant can meet retirement goals through the proper management of financial resources.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 46, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 122, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2021 ch. 111, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

18A.235.
System established — Corporate powers.

The Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation System is established pursuant to the provisions of KRS

18A.230

to

18A.275

, and shall transact all of its business and shall have the powers and privileges of a corporation.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 47, effective July 15, 1982.

18A.240.
Trust fund.

A state fund is hereby authorized, called “The Kentucky State Public Employees Deferred Compensation Trust Fund,” which shall consist of all of the assets of the system as set forth in KRS

18A.230

to

18A.275

. No part of this fund shall revert to the general fund of the Commonwealth.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 48, effective July 15, 1982; 2008, ch. 181, § 2, effective July 15, 2008.

18A.245.
Board of trustees — Membership, terms, meetings — Powers — Executive director — Annual financial report.

The authority shall be administered by a board of trustees composed of seven (7) members, who shall be as follows:

Secretary, Finance and Administration Cabinet, ex officio;

Secretary of personnel, ex officio;

The state controller, ex officio;

The State Treasurer, ex officio; and

Three (3) at-large members appointed by the Governor, who do not have a conflict of interest as provided by KRS

18A.262

, one (1) of whom shall have at least five (5) years of investment or banking experience and one (1) of whom shall be a representative of a nonstate government employer.

The members of the board appointed by the Governor shall serve for a period of four (4) years and the ex officio members of the board shall serve only for the period of their term of office. Each ex officio member may designate a proxy by written notice to the authority prior to call of order of each meeting, and the proxy shall be entitled to participate as a full voting member.

Any vacancy which may occur shall be filled in the same manner provided for the selection of the particular member for a full term. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term only.

Membership on the board of trustees shall not be incompatible with any other office unless a constitutional incompatibility exists, and no member shall be subject to removal from office, except upon conviction of a felony, or of a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude.

Board members who do not otherwise receive a salary or compensation from the State Treasury shall receive a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day they are in session or on official duty, and they shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses in accordance with state administrative regulations and standards applicable to state employees.

The board shall meet at least once in each quarter of the year, and may meet in special session upon the call of the chairman. It shall elect a chairman and a vice chairman. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum, and all actions taken by the board shall be by affirmative vote of a majority of the members present.

The authority shall be attached to the Personnel Cabinet for administrative purposes only. The board may take but is not limited to the following actions:

Appoint such employees as it deems necessary and fix the compensation for all employees of the board, subject to the approval of the secretary. The authority shall be headed by an executive director who shall be appointed by the board of directors of the authority without the limitations imposed by KRS

12.040

and KRS Chapter 18A. The executive director of the authority and employees appointed by the board shall serve at its will and pleasure. All other staff of the authority shall be employed under KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

;

Require such employees as it thinks proper to execute bonds for the faithful performance of their duties;

Establish a system of accounting;

Contract for such services as may be necessary for the operation or administration of deferred compensation plans authorized in KRS

18A.230

to

18A.275

, including annual audits;

Do all things, take all actions, and adopt plans for participation consistent with federal law and with the provisions of KRS

18A.230

to

18A.275

, including but not limited to:

Amending the board’s plan for the Kentucky Public Employees 401(k) Deferred Compensation Plan or the Kentucky Employees 457 Deferred Compensation Plan, or both such plans, to adopt, maintain, and terminate a deemed IRA program under Internal Revenue Code Section 408;

Amending the board’s plan for the Kentucky Public Employees 401(k) Deferred Compensation Plan to adopt, maintain, and terminate a qualified Roth contribution program under Internal Revenue Code Section 402A; and

Adopting, maintaining, and terminating an Internal Revenue Code Section 403(b) plan for qualified employees; and

Contract with persons or companies duly licensed by the state of Kentucky and applicable federal regulatory agencies, at the cost of the trust fund or individual participant accounts, to provide investment advice and financial planning to participants in the plans, with respect to their selection of investments. The board may promulgate administrative regulations for provision of financial planning to participants in the plans.

The Attorney General, or an assistant designated by him, may act as legal adviser and attorney for the board. The board may also appoint legal counsel in accordance with KRS Chapter 12.

The board shall prepare an annual financial report showing all receipts, disbursements, assets, and liabilities and shall submit a copy to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission. All board meetings and records shall be open for inspection by the public.

HISTORY:

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 49, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 234, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 496, § 25, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 154, § 50, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 123, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2008, ch. 181, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2012, ch. 10, § 5, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 107, § 84, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 153, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 102, § 40, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 111, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). This statute was amended by
2021 Ky. Acts ch. 102 and repealed, reenacted, and amended by
2021 Ky. Acts ch. 111. The amendments do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

18A.250.
Deferred compensation system — Automatic enrollment of employees hired after July 1, 2019 — Automatic enrollment of justices, judges, and members of the General Assembly elected or appointed after July 1, 2021.

The authority shall establish and maintain a deferred compensation plan for the employees of the State of Kentucky. Participation in such plan shall be by agreement between such employees and the authority and shall provide for the deferral of such amount of compensation as requested by the employee. Participating employees must authorize that such deductions be made from their wages for the purpose of participation in such program.

The board is directed to develop and obtain, for the benefit of employees, a qualified employee plan that includes a qualified cash or deferred arrangement as described in Section 401(k) of the Internal Revenue Code. The board is directed to develop a program for participants to borrow from their account or accounts in the plan. The plan shall be in addition to other plans offered by the board, and shall be offered to employees upon receipt of appropriate approval of the Internal Revenue Service or on January 1, 1985, whichever occurs later.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

337.060

, agreements to participate and plan elections made by employees pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section may be made in writing or by electronic record, signature, or contract as determined by the authority and in accordance with the provisions of KRS

369.101

to

369.120

. Agreements and elections, including but not limited to hardship withdrawal applications, loan applications, beneficiary designations, and withdrawal requests made by participating employees under the plan, shall not be denied legal effect or enforceability if made electronically to the extent permitted by the authority.

Notwithstanding KRS

337.060

and subsections (1) to (3) of this section:

Each full-time employee of the executive, judicial, and legislative branches of Kentucky state government hired on or after July 1, 2019, shall be automatically enrolled in the 401(k) plan established pursuant to this section, and the employee’s compensation shall be reduced by thirty dollars ($30) per month and contributed as a pre-tax deferral to the 401(k) plan unless and until the employee makes a deferral election under the terms of the 401(k) plan. Full-time status shall be determined by an employee’s employer. The authority shall not be responsible or liable for any cost or liabilities resulting from such eligibility determinations made by an employer;

Each new member of the General Assembly elected or appointed on or after July 1, 2021, upon taking office, shall be automatically enrolled in the 401(k) plan established pursuant to this section, and the member’s compensation shall be reduced by thirty dollars ($30) per month and contributed as a pre-tax deferral to the 401(k) plan unless and until the member makes a deferral election under the terms of the 401(k) plan;

Each new justice of the Supreme Court and each new regular judge of the Court of Appeals, Circuit Court, District Court, and Family Court elected or appointed on or after July 1, 2021, upon taking office, shall be automatically enrolled in the 401(k) plan, and the justice’s or judge’s compensation, as applicable, shall be reduced by thirty dollars ($30) per month and contributed as a pre-tax deferral to the 401(k) plan unless and until the justice or judge, as applicable, makes a deferral election under the terms of the 401(k) plan. This section shall not apply to special judges appointed under KRS

26A.020

; and

The automatic enrollment shall begin as of the employee’s first paycheck or as soon as administratively feasible thereafter. The board shall select a default investment fund or funds, pursuant to applicable federal law, for investment of an employee’s deferrals into the employee’s account until the employee makes an investment election. The board shall amend the 401(k) plan for the implementation and administration of employee automatic enrollment, and the board shall have authority to implement automatic enrollment consistent with applicable requirements of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The board may promulgate administrative regulations for implementation of automatic enrollment.

History.

Repealed and reenacted Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 50, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 154, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 483, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 154, § 51, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 122, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2019 ch. 48, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 153, § 3, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 111, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

18A.252.
Inviolability of employee deferred compensation contributions to trust fund.

The contributions to the trust fund of participants’ deferred compensation represent private employee contributions. The assets and earnings of the trust fund shall at all times be preserved, invested, and expended solely for the purposes of the trust and shall be held in trust for the exclusive benefit of the participants and beneficiaries, and no right or interest therein shall exist in favor of the Commonwealth. The assets and earnings shall not be transferred or used by the Commonwealth for any purposes other than the purposes of the trust fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 181, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

18A.255.
Investments — Limitation of liability.

Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS

18A.230

to

18A.275

, funds held for the State of Kentucky public employees deferred compensation trust fund pursuant to agreement between the state and participating employees may be invested in such investments as are deemed appropriate by the trustees, including but not limited to annuity contracts. Agreements may be made in writing or by electronic record, signature, or contract as determined by the authority in accordance with the provisions of KRS

369.101

to

369.120

and shall not be denied legal effect or enforceability if made electronically to the extent permitted by the authority.

Funds deposited to the credit of the trust fund from payroll deductions made pursuant to KRS

18A.250

shall be temporarily invested as provided in KRS

42.500

until such funds are invested pursuant to the deferred compensation agreements between the state and participating employees and actually credited to accounts for plan participants. Notwithstanding KRS

42.500

, interest earned from such temporary investments shall be used to defray the expenses of administering the deferred compensation system.

Neither the authority nor the board shall be liable for any losses or claims due to a participant’s actions in connection with the investment advice or financial planning provided to the participant by operation of KRS 18A.245(7)(f) or otherwise. The authority and board shall have no duty or obligation to monitor, review, or assess the specific investment advice or financial planning provided to a participant.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. by 1982, ch. 448, § 51, effective July 15, 1982; 2008, ch. 181, § 4, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 122, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2021 ch. 111, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.

18A.260.
Regulations of investments.

In no case shall such investment be other than permitted by KRS

18A.230

to

18A.275

and not prohibited by Section 177 of the Kentucky Constitution and must be offered by such persons or companies authorized and duly licensed by the State of Kentucky and applicable federal regulatory agencies to offer such insurance or investment programs in compliance with all relevant provisions of KRS

18A.230

to

18A.275

.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 52, effective July 15, 1982.

18A.262.
Conflicts of interest for Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation Authority employees and trustees.

No trustee or employee of the board or authority shall:

Have any interest, direct or indirect, in the gains or profits of any investment or any other legal, business, or financial transaction made by the board or authority, except that any such trustee or employee may be a member, employee, or beneficiary of the plans administered by the board or authority;

Directly or indirectly, for himself or herself or as an agent, use the assets of the plans administered by the board or authority, except to make current and necessary payments authorized by the board or authority;

Become an endorser or surety or in any manner an obligor for moneys loaned by or borrowed from the board or authority;

Have a contract or agreement with the board or authority, individually or through a business owned by the trustee or the employee;

Use his or her official position with the board or authority to obtain a financial gain or benefit or advantage for himself or herself or a family member;

Use confidential information acquired during his or her tenure with the board or authority to further his or her own economic interests or that of another person; or

Hold outside employment with, or accept compensation from, any person or business with which he or she has involvement as part of his or her official position with the board or authority. The provisions of this paragraph shall not prohibit a trustee from serving as an employee of an agency participating in the plans.

No trustee or employee of the board or authority, who has served as a trustee or employee of the board or authority on or after July 1, 2017, shall have any interest, direct or indirect, in the gains or profits of any investment or any other legal, business, or financial transaction made by the board or authority for a period of five (5) years following termination of his or her position, except that any such trustee or employee may be a member, employee, or beneficiary of the plans administered by the board or authority.

No person who is serving as a member of the General Assembly or is a public servant as defined by KRS 11A.010(9) shall have any interest, direct or indirect, in the gains or profits of any investment or any other legal, business, or financial transaction made by the board or authority, except that any such trustee or public servant may be a member, employee, or beneficiary of the plans administered by the board or authority.

No person who was serving as a member of the General Assembly on or after July 1, 2017, or was serving as a public servant as defined by KRS 11A.010(9) on or after July 1, 2017, shall have any interest, direct or indirect, in the gains or profits of any investment or any other legal, business, or financial transaction made by the board or authority for a period of five (5) years following termination of his or her position, except that any such member or public servant may be a member, employee, or beneficiary of the plans administered by the board or authority.

HISTORY:

Repealed and reenacted by 2021 ch. 111, § 5, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. This statute was created in Section 82 of that Act.

18A.265.
Deferred compensation program to be in addition to retirement or benefit programs — Coordination of programs.

Such a deferred compensation program shall be in addition to any retirement or any other benefit program provided by law for employees of this state. Any income deferred under such a plan shall continue to be included as regular compensation for the purpose of computing the retirement and pension benefits earned by any employee. But, any sum so deducted shall not be included in the computation of any income taxes withheld on behalf of any such employee.

The board shall, jointly with the board of trustees of the Kentucky retirement systems, prepare and implement a program for advising employees on coordinating deferred compensation plans and retirement programs in order to achieve their retirement objectives.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 143, §
8; repealed and reenact., Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 53, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 234, § 2, effective July 13, 1984.

18A.270.
Local programs.

Any city, county, or other political subdivision or combination of these entities may establish for its employees a deferred compensation program. Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

337.060

, participation shall be by written agreement or by electronic record, signature, or contract and in accordance with the provisions of KRS

369.101

to

369.120

between such employees and the legislative authority of the city, county, or other political subdivision providing for the deferral of such compensation and the subsequent investment and administration of such funds. Agreements and elections, including but not limited to hardship withdrawal applications, loan applications, beneficiary designations, and withdrawal requests made by participating employees under the plans, shall not be denied legal effect or enforceability if made electronically to the extent permitted by the authority.

Such subdivision, acting through its legislative authority, may appoint such agency or department as it deems appropriate to establish and administer a deferred compensation plan pursuant to KRS

18A.230

to

18A.275

. For purposes of funding such agreements between the city, county, or other such political subdivision and the participating employees, the agency or department as designated by the legislative authority to establish and administer such plans may invest such funds in such investments deemed appropriate by said agency or department, including, but not limited to annuity contracts.

In no case shall such investment be other than permitted by KRS

18A.230

to

18A.275

and not prohibited by Section 179 of the Kentucky Constitution and must be offered by such persons or companies authorized and duly licensed by the State of Kentucky and applicable federal regulatory agencies to offer such insurance or investment programs in compliance with all relevant provisions of KRS

18A.230

to

18A.275

.

Such a deferred compensation program is in addition to any retirement or pension system or any other benefit program provided by law for employees of the city, county, or other political subdivision. Any income deferred under such a plan shall continue to be included as regular compensation for the purpose of computing the retirement and pension benefits earned by any employee but any sum so deducted shall not be included in the computation of any income taxes withheld for any such employee.

This section does not limit the power or authority of any municipal corporation or other political subdivision to provide other such plans or programs for deferring compensation of their officials and employees.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 54, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 122, § 4, effective July 15, 2010.

18A.275.
Custodian of funds.

The board shall select a custodian of the funds collected under KRS

18A.230

to

18A.275

, and the authority shall administer the funds so collected as provided in this chapter.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 55, effective July 15, 1982; 2019 ch. 153, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

18A.350.
Definition of employee.

As used in KRS

18A.355

“employee” means any officer or employee of the executive branch of government. The provisions of KRS

18A.355

do not apply to employees of the General Assembly, the Legislative Research Commission, or the Court of Justice, or to any constitutional officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 456, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 494, § 26, effective July 15, 1986.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Although KRS

18A.350

to

18A.360

clearly provide that unclassified employes will be entitled to the annual increment, the statutes provide no indication as to when the Legislature intended this benefit to take place, and such a decision should be left to the Department of Personnel which has the authority to promulgate rules for the unclassified service.

OAG 82-355

.

Just as KRS

64.640

provides an upper limit for all employes with regard to their potential salary, including any five percent increases, KRS

161.340

must be read into KRS

18A.350

to

18A.360

to provide an absolute upper salary limit for the executive secretary of the Teachers’ Retirement System to be the maximum set for commissioners by KRS

64.640

(2).

OAG 82-355

.

KRS

18A.350

to

18A.360

apply to all employes in the executive branch, (except those specifically excluded), both part-time and full-time, regardless of the number of hours worked and regardless of status.

OAG 82-355

.

The incumbents of the Workers’ Compensation Board, the Real Estate Commission, the Board of Claims, the Crime Victims Compensation Board, the Board of Tax Appeals, the Parole Board, the Board of Chiropractic Examiners, the Board of Elections, the Athletic Commission and the Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission are included in the language of this section which defines employee as any officer or employee of the executive branch of government; therefore, it would appear that the members of these boards and commissions are eligible for annual increments although it is entirely possible that this was not the intent of the Legislature, especially with regard to the members of the Workers’ Compensation Board which indexes compensation to the salaries of appeals court judges.

OAG 90-25

.